Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 5 Tuberculosis Control

4-5-1.
Report of affected animal — Test.

Whenever the owner of any bovine animal suspects that animal to be affected with tuberculosis, and, in writing, requests the director of environmental management to inspect the animal, or if the director suspects any bovine animal to be affected with tuberculosis, the director shall immediately direct a veterinarian to inspect and test that animal on a specified day. The test in all cases shall be a tuberculin test conforming to the standards of the United States department of agriculture.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 10; P.L. 1904, ch. 1156, § 1; P.L. 1906, ch. 1354, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 10; P.L. 1927, ch. 971, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-1

.

4-5-2.
Identification of reactors.

Any animal showing a positive reaction to a tuberculin test shall be classified as a reactor and be identified in a manner which is recommended by the United States livestock sanitary association, and the animal disease eradication branch of the agricultural research service, United States department of agriculture.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 207, § 3A; P.L. 1956, ch. 3788, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-2

.

4-5-3.
Condemnation of diseased animals.

If a tuberculin test indicates that an animal is affected with tuberculosis, or if, even though the animal fails to react to that test, the veterinarian shall condemn the animal as affected with tuberculosis, the animal shall at once be appraised under §

4-5-4

and killed in the presence of the director or veterinarian and the owner, or if the owner is not present, then in the presence of the person who has charge of the animal for the owner and its carcass shall be disposed of in a manner not to be detrimental to the public health.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 10; P.L. 1904, ch. 1156, § 1; P.L. 1906, ch. 1354, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 10; P.L. 1927, ch. 971, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-3

.

4-5-4.
Appraisal of condemned animals.

For the purposes of §

4-5-3

, the veterinarian and the agent assigned by the director shall constitute the board of appraisers, and the estimate of value by those two (2) persons is final, except as otherwise provided. Written notice of the amount of the appraisal, signed by the board of appraisers, is to be immediately given to the owner or claimant of the animal. Any party aggrieved by an award made under this section may appeal to the director of environmental management within five (5) days after the receipt of the notice.

Appraisals are based upon current receipts at nearby public auctions or public sales.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 11; P.L. 1904, ch. 1156, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 11; P.L. 1917, ch. 1542, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2103, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 11; P.L. 1929, ch. 1308, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-4

; P.L. 1973, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 78, § 2.

4-5-5.
Sale of carcasses of condemned animals.

The director of environmental management is authorized to sell the carcass of any animal killed as tuberculous, when in the opinion of the board of appraisers that sale should be permitted. The proceeds of that sale shall be paid to the owner of the animal killed in accordance with this chapter, after deducting from those proceeds the cost of slaughtering or transporting the animal to a slaughterhouse and other expenses incident to the killing and selling of the animal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 120, § 11; P.L. 1921, ch. 2103, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 11; P.L. 1929, ch. 1308, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-5

.

4-5-6.
Payment for condemned animals — Prerequisites.

In the case of any bovine animal condemned as having any infectious, contagious, or communicable disease considered dangerous to livestock or public health, upon receipt of a post mortem examination, conducted by a veterinarian approved by the department of environmental management or one licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state, the state may pay to the owner an indemnity not to exceed the difference between the appraised value of each animal destroyed less the net salvage received by the owner and any funds received from federal indemnity payments. No payment shall exceed five hundred dollars ($500), and any joint state federal indemnity payments plus salvage shall not exceed the appraised value of the animals. No payment shall be made for any animal that is condemned and killed if that animal is from a herd that has not been maintained in accordance with the rules, regulations, and standards of the state, and of any state and federal regulations for the suppression of bovine disease or if that animal has been imported into this state where there has been no compliance with the rules, regulations, and standards of the state governing the requirements for importation. The premises where the diseased animal has been kept shall be thoroughly cleansed and disinfected according to the regulations of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 13; P.L. 1896, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1904, ch. 1156, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 13; P.L. 1926, ch. 788, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 971, § 2; P.L. 1929, ch. 1308, § 2; P.L. 1931, ch. 1702, § 1; P.L. 1931, ch. 1786, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-6

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 1979, ch. 57, § 1.

4-5-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 344, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 14; P.L. 1926, ch. 788, § 2; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 2; P.L. 1931, ch. 1786, § 2; P.L. 1934, ch. 2131, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-7

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 16, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 16, 2015.

4-5-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 14; P.L. 1926, ch. 788, § 2; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 2; P.L. 1931, ch. 1786, § 2; P.L. 1934, ch. 2131, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-8

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 16, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 16, 2015.

4-5-9.
Animals imported for slaughter.

In the case of animals shipped into Rhode Island for immediate slaughter, the director of environmental management may at his or her discretion waive the filing of the chart and certificate; in those instances the director shall issue a special permit covering those animals for immediate slaughter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 14; P.L. 1931, ch. 1786, § 2; P.L. 1934, ch. 2131, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-9

.

4-5-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 344, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 14; P.L. 1926, ch. 788, § 2; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 2; P.L. 1931, ch. 1786, § 2; P.L. 1934, ch. 2131, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-10

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 16, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 16, 2015.

4-5-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 344, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-11

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 16, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 16, 2015.

4-5-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1900, ch. 756, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 16; P.L. 1926, ch. 788, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-12

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 16, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 16, 2015.

4-5-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1900, ch. 756, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-13

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 16, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 16, 2015.

4-5-14.
Quarantine of imported cattle — Intradermic test.

If after the importation of cattle by any person, firm, corporation, or association, the director of environmental management is of the opinion that any of the cattle imported are at risk to be infected with tuberculosis, or if he or she has reason to question the accuracy or reliability of the test charts under which the cattle were imported into this state, or if for any other reason he or she believes any of the cattle so imported may be affected with tuberculosis, the director, if in his or her judgment that action appears advisable, shall place the cattle in quarantine at their destination or at some other suitable place to be designated by the director, and the cattle shall be held in quarantine for a period of not more than ninety (90) days or until released by order of the director within that period. While those cattle are held in quarantine, the director shall cause them to be tested for tuberculosis with tuberculin by the intradermic test.

History of Section.

P.L. 1900, ch. 756, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 18; P.L. 1923, ch. 432, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 788, § 4; P.L. 1928, ch. 1135, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-14

; P.L. 2015, ch. 60, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 64, § 2.

4-5-15.
Slaughter of infected cattle — Release of cattle free from tuberculosis.

If as the result of the test pursuant to §

4-5-14

it is found that any cattle are afflicted with tuberculosis, the diseased cattle shall be immediately slaughtered in the manner provided in §

4-5-3

and the state shall not be required to compensate the owner for their loss but the owner shall pay for testing the cattle with tuberculin. If any cattle are found free from tuberculosis as the result of the test pursuant to §

4-5-14

, they shall be released for the use and benefit of the owner. If any cattle are slaughtered and upon post mortem examination it is found that the slaughtered animal was not afflicted with tuberculosis, then the animal shall be paid for by the state at its full appraised value in accordance with §

4-5-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1900, ch. 756, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 18; P.L. 1923, ch. 432, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 788, § 4; P.L. 1928, ch. 1135, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-15

.

4-5-16.
Penalty for violation of import requirements.

Any person taking cattle out of, or otherwise breaking, the quarantine provided for in §

4-5-14

or violating any other provision of §§

4-5-12

—

4-5-15

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1900, ch. 756, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 19; P.L. 1928, ch. 1135, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-16

.

4-5-17.
Willful violations of import requirements.

When any person is shown to have knowingly brought into this state an animal suffering, or suspected to be suffering, with tuberculosis, or to have concealed the existence of that disease in any animal owned by him or her, that person is not entitled to any compensation for the animal slaughtered under this chapter, and is deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined for that offense not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-17

.

4-5-18.
Violations by public officers.

Any cattle commissioner, veterinarian or other officer, agent, or employee appointed by the director of environmental management, having immediate control of the carcass of an affected animal as described in §

4-5-3

, who permits the disposal of that carcass or any part in any manner as will be detrimental to the public health, shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years.

Any cattle commissioner, veterinarian or other officer, agent, or employee appointed who shall knowingly certify for payment the claim of any person not the owner of the affected animals at the time of the test described in §

4-5-1

, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 30; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-18

.

4-5-19.
Penalty for violations generally.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter for which a penalty is not otherwise provided shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 30; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-19

.

4-5-20.
Establishment of tuberculosis-free areas.

The director of environmental management may, in his or her discretion, establish circumscribed areas within which all bovine cattle are subjected to the tuberculin test, but in no case shall that area be smaller than a single city or town as provided. Before this area is established, the owners of eighty-five percent (85%) of the cattle, or seventy-five percent (75%) of the cattle owners in this area shall make application, in writing, on official form to the director, placing their herds under the inspection and supervision of the state or of the United States, for the eradication of bovine tuberculosis. Upon receipt of a sufficient number of those applications, the director shall first satisfy himself or herself that those applications have been signed by the requisite number of cattle owners within the designated area, and all those applications are open to inspection at all times. If satisfied that those applications have been signed by the requisite number of cattle owners, the director may establish this area or areas which he or she shall clearly bound and describe, and within which bovine tuberculosis is to be eradicated at the expense of the state or United States, and he or she shall cause all those cattle within that area or areas to be quarantined, tested, appraised, and condemned as provided in §§

4-5-1

—

4-5-6

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 43; P.L. 1932, ch. 1926, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-20

.

4-5-21.
Advertisement of tuberculosis-free areas.

Before proceeding to quarantine an area and to test the cattle in the area pursuant to §

4-5-20

, the director of environmental management shall advertise the establishment of that area in some newspaper published in one of the towns included in that area, or if there is no newspaper published in any of those towns, then in a newspaper published in the county in which the area is situated. The advertisement shall state the date when the area is to be established and shall set forth in detail the proceedings to be followed in quarantining and testing the cattle within the area, and what will be required of the owners of those cattle. A notice similar in substance to the advertisement shall be posted on a public sign post in each city or town wholly or in part within the area. The advertisement shall be published and the notice posted not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days before the date when the area is to be established.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 43; P.L. 1932, ch. 1926, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-21

.

4-5-22.
Administration of tuberculosis-free areas.

After any area has been established pursuant to §§

4-5-20

and

4-5-21

, no cattle shall be brought or transported into that area, except in accordance with the provisions of §§

4-5-7

—

4-5-1

0, and except that cattle transported through the area on the highways by truck or railroad, and no cattle shall be taken from that area except with the consent of the director of environmental management during the process of accreditation. Within six (6) months after the date of the establishment of this area, the director shall to the extent that funds are available for that purpose cause all remaining untested bovine cattle in this area to be tested as provided in §§

4-5-1

—

4-5-6

in accordance with the uniform rules and regulations promulgated by the United States livestock sanitary association and approved by the United States department of agriculture. After the area has been designated a modified accredited area, the cattle in this area shall be tested as provided in §§ 4-5-1 —

4-5-6

at such intervals as may be deemed advisable by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 43; P.L. 1932, ch. 1926, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-22

.

4-5-23.
Violations as to tuberculosis-free areas.

Any person or any officer or agent of any corporation who violates any provision of §§

4-5-20

—

4-5-22

or who hinders or obstructs the director of environmental management or any other authorized person in the discharge of any duty imposed by the provisions of §§

4-5-20

—

4-5-22

, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days or shall suffer both the fine and imprisonment for each offense, and for each animal transported into any of these areas contrary to the provisions of §§ 4-5-20 — 4-5-22 a separate offense may be charged.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 44; P.L. 1932, ch. 1926, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 207, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

4-5-23

.